Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5618.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly by hereby finds and declares:
(1) That a necessary course of action is needed to improve the safety of those in the State
of Rhode Island.
(2) While EMS employees, vehicles, and stations all carry epinephrine autoinjectors, police
officers are more likely to respond to a scene first.
(3) Saving time can save lives, and mandating police officers to carry epinephrine
autoinjectors will greatly reduce the complications and fatalities from anaphylaxis.
(4) Many allergens are unknown, whether by the patient or someone around them, and
anaphylaxis can set in quickly depending on the severity of the allergy. The longer the patient’s
throat is closed, the longer their body goes without receiving oxygen, which can lead to organ
failure, brain damage, and even death. That means that the time spent waiting for EMS to arrive
can mean the difference between full recovery and death.
(5) Additionally, police officers are often patrolling the streets of Rhode Island, unlike
EMS, and may notice or be drawn to an anaphylactic emergency in their district. Having no way to
help the patient(s) other than calling for EMS is a dangerous risk to take. Having an epinephrine
autoinjector available, as well as the skills necessary to administer it, is incredibly important when
there is no time to be wasted.
(6) It can be argued that police officers do not need more medical training than federally

mandated, as that is what EMS is for, but in reality, the more people who have the knowledge,
skills, and supplies to save lives, the better it is for everyone.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 6.6
THE MANDATORY CARRYING OF EPINEPHRINE AUTOINJECTORS BY POLICE
OFFICERS ACT
23-6.6-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Mandatory Carrying of Epinephrine
Autoinjectors by Police Officers Act.”
23-6.6-2. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Epinephrine” means a hormone/medication which is used to regulate visceral
functions and reduce/treat patients who are in anaphylactic shock.
(2) “Epinephrine autoinjector” means the device used to administer a premeasured dose of
epinephrine to treat one suffering from anaphylactic shock.
(3) “Anaphylactic shock" or "Anaphylaxis” means the severe allergic reaction which
causes, but is not limited to, swelling of the tongue/throat, trouble breathing, weak pulse, and
potentially death.
(4) “Peace officer” means any state or municipal police officer serving in Rhode Island as
defined in § 12-7-21.
(5) “Police vehicles” means any motor vehicle used by police officers.
(6) “Police station” means any building which is used to accommodate police officers and
other members of police staff.
(7) “Police department” means any state or municipal department with jurisdiction within
Rhode Island.
(8) “EMS” means all emergency medical services in Rhode Island.
23-6.6-3. Duties and obligations of police officers and police departments.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the general laws that prohibit a peace officer
from administering epinephrine, a controlled substance, or utilizing an epinephrine autoinjector:
(1) All peace officers shall henceforth be authorized to administer epinephrine
autoinjectors.
(2) All peace officers shall carry epinephrine autoinjectors in their police vehicles.
(3) If a peace officer does not have a police vehicle, they shall carry an epinephrine
LC001308 - Page 2 of 4

autoinjector on their person.
(4) All peace officers shall attend biannual mandatory training on the use of epinephrine
autoinjectors.
(5) The cost of epinephrine autoinjectors and officer training shall be incorporated into the
budget of each police department.
(b)(1) Police departments shall purchase all epinephrine autoinjectors necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.
(2) Police departments shall comply with the mandates of this chapter and beginning in the
fiscal year 2026 each entity controlling or authorizing the budget of a police department shall fund
the budget to effect compliance with the mandates of this chapter.
23-6.6-4. Penalties for failure to comply.
(a) Any peace officer that fails to carry epinephrine autoinjectors due to their own
negligence, shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) per hour the officer was without the officer's issued
epinephrine autoinjector(s).
(b) Any police department that fails to distribute epinephrine autoinjectors as mandated by
this chapter, shall be fined five thousand dollars ($5,000) per month until the department comes
into compliance.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001308
========
LC001308 - Page 3 of 4